Massachusetts, session 194th, H21.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (a) of Subdivision (1) of Section 8 of Chapter 32, as most recently amended by
Section 69 of Chapter 140 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking “ without a
medical or vocational rehabilitation program, or whether such member's return to his former or
similar job within the same department would likely be expedited by participation in a medical
or vocational rehabilitation program”.
Said Paragraph (a) is further amended by striking the 3rd and 4th paragraphs.
Paragraph (a) of Subdivision 2 of Section 8 is hereby amended by striking “if following
the completion of a rehabilitation program required under subdivision (1), a regional medical
pane so finds,”
Subdivision (3) of Section 8 of Chapter 32, is hereby amended by striking subdivision (3)
and inserting in its place:
of 3

(3) Modifications of retirement allowances. If as a result of such medical report by a
regional medical panel, as a result of the submission of earnings information under section
ninety-one A, the commission finds that such retired member is engaged in gainful occupation
and has excess earnings, for three or more consecutive years, which result in the repayment of
his or her entire retirement allowance pursuant to section 91A, said member’s retirement
allowance shall be modified prospectively.
When a determination is made that a retirement allowance shall be modified, the retiree
and the appropriate Retirement Board will be notified, and the retiree will be given the
opportunity to be heard by the Commission or its designee. When the determination is final, the
retiree and the appropriate Retirement Board will be advised. The retiree may appeal the
Commission’s determination to the Contributory Retirement Appeal Board pursuant to section
16. Such modification shall remain in effect, for at least one year, unless such medical report
finds that the mental or physical condition of such member has deteriorated. If the annual rate of
his earnings should later be changed, the yearly amount of his pension shall be further modified
by reinstating, increasing, reducing, or suspending it, as the case may be.
The applicable Retirement Board may pay over to a health insurance carrier that portion
of the allowance to maintain the disability retiree’s health insurance coverage. A retiree whose
allowance is modified pursuant to this process will continue to be considered as a disability
retiree for purposes of chapter 32A, chapter 32B, chapter 34B, and section 100B of chapter 41.
The public employee retirement administration commission shall, subject to the
provisions of section fifty of chapter seven, promulgate regulations establishing, and providing a
system for annually adjusting for inflation and such other equitable factors as the commission
of 3

deems relevant, the fair amount of outside income that may be earned by a member retired
pursuant to section six or seven, and shall promulgate regulations for the determination of the
potential earnings of any such retired member based upon such member's functional capacity,
age, education, and experience.
of 3